Utah statutes.
58-11a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Approved barber or cosmetologist/barber apprenticeship" means an
apprenticeship that meets the requirements of Subsection 58-11a-306(1) for
barbers or Subsection 58-11a-306(2) for cosmetologist/barbers and the
requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the
board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act.
(2)  "Approved esthetician apprenticeship" means an apprenticeship that meets
the requirements of Subsection 58-11a-306(3) and the requirements established
by rule by the division in collaboration with the board in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(3)  "Approved master esthetician apprenticeship" means an apprenticeship that
meets the requirements of Subsection 58-11a-306(4) and the requirements
established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(4)  "Approved nail technician apprenticeship" means an apprenticeship that
meets the requirements of Subsection 58-11a-306(5) and the requirements
established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(5)  "Barber" means a person who is licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of barbering.
(6)  "Barber instructor" means a barber who is licensed under this chapter to
teach barbering at a licensed barber school or in an apprenticeship program as
defined in Section 58-11a-306.
(7)  "Board" means the Barber, Cosmetology/Barbering, Esthetics, Electrology,
and Nail Technology Licensing Board created in Section 58-11a-201.
(8)   "Cosmetologist/barber" means a person who is licensed under this chapter
to engage in the practice of cosmetology/barbering.
(9)   "Cosmetologist/barber  instructor" means a cosmetologist/barber who is
licensed under this chapter to teach cosmetology/barbering at a licensed
cosmetology/barber school, licensed barber school, licensed nail technology
school, or in an apprenticeship program as defined in Subsection
58-11a-306(2).
(10)  "Direct supervision" means that the supervisor of an apprentice or the
instructor of a student is immediately available for consultation, advice,
instruction, and evaluation.
(11)  "Electrologist" means a person who is licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of electrology.
(12)  "Electrologist instructor" means an electrologist who is licensed under
this chapter to teach electrology at a licensed electrology school.
(13)  "Esthetician" means a person who is licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of esthetics.
(14)  "Esthetician instructor" means a master esthetician who is licensed
under this chapter to teach the practice of esthetics and the practice of
master-level esthetics at a licensed esthetics school, a licensed
cosmetology/barber school, or in an apprenticeship program as defined in
Subsection 58-11a-306(3).
(15)  "Fund" means the Barber, Cosmetologist/Barber, Esthetician,
Electrologist, and Nail Technician Education and Enforcement Fund created in
Section 58-11a-103.
(16)  "Licensed barber or cosmetology/barber school" means a barber or
cosmetology/barber school licensed under this chapter.
(17)  "Licensed electrology school" means an electrology school licensed under
this chapter.
(18)  "Licensed esthetics school" means an esthetics school licensed under
this chapter.
(19)  "Licensed nail technology school" means a nail technology school
licensed under this chapter.
(20)  "Master esthetician" means an individual who is licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of master-level esthetics.
(21)  "Nail technician" means an individual who is licensed under this chapter
to engage in the practice of nail technology.
(22)  "Nail technician instructor" means a nail technician licensed under this
chapter to teach the practice of nail technology in a licensed nail technology
school, a licensed cosmetology/barber school, or in an apprenticeship program
as defined in Subsection 58-11a-306(5).
(23)  "Practice of barbering" means:
(a)  cutting, clipping, or trimming the hair of the head of any person by the
use of scissors, shears, clippers, or other appliances;
(b)  draping, shampooing, scalp treatments, basic wet styling, and blow
drying; and
(c)  removing hair from the face or neck of a person by the use of shaving
equipment.
(24)  "Practice of barbering instruction" means instructing barbering in a
licensed barber school, licensed cosmetology/barber school, or in an
apprenticeship program as defined in Subsection 58-11a-306(1).
(25)  "Practice of basic esthetics" means any one of the following skin care
procedures done on the head, face, neck, arms, hands, legs, feet, eyebrows, or
eyelashes for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of medical,
physical, or mental ailments:
(a)  cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising, applying oils,
antiseptics, clays, or masks, manual extraction, including a comodone
extractor, depilatories, waxes, tweezing, natural nail manicures or pedicures,
or callous removal by buffing or filing;
(b)  limited chemical exfoliation as defined by rule;
(c)  removing superfluous hair by means other than electrolysis;
(d)  other esthetic preparations or procedures with the use of the hands, a
high-frequency or galvanic electrical apparatus, or a heat lamp for cosmetic
purposes and not for the treatment of medical, physical, or mental ailments;
or
(e)  cosmetic laser procedures under direct supervision of a licensed health
care practitioner as defined by rule, limited to the following:
(i)  superfluous hair removal;
(ii)  anti-aging resurfacing enhancements;
(iii)  photo rejuvenation; or
(iv)  tattoo removal.
(26) (a)  "Practice of cosmetology/barbering"  means:
(i)  styling, arranging, dressing, curling, waving, permanent waving,
cleansing, singeing, bleaching, dyeing, tinting, coloring, or similarly
treating the hair of the head of a person;
(ii)  cutting, clipping, or trimming the hair by the use of scissors, shears,
clippers, or other appliances;
(iii)  arching eyebrows, or tinting eyebrows or eyelashes, or both;
(iv)   removing hair from the face, neck, shoulders, arms, back, torso, feet,
bikini line, or legs of a person by the use of depilatories, waxing, or
shaving equipment;
(v)   cutting, curling, styling, fitting, measuring, or forming caps for wigs
or hairpieces or both on the human head; or
(vi)   practicing hair weaving or hair fusing or servicing previously
medically implanted hair.
(b)  The term "practice of cosmetology/barbering" includes:
(i)  the practice of basic esthetics; and
(ii)  the practice of nail technology.
(27)   "Practice of cosmetology/barbering instruction" means instructing
cosmetology/barbering as defined in Subsection (26) in a licensed
cosmetology/barber school or in an apprenticeship program as defined in
Subsection 58-11a-306(2).
(28)  "Practice of electrology" means:
(a)  the removal of superfluous hair from the body of a person by the use of
electricity, waxing, shaving, or tweezing; or
(b)  cosmetic laser procedures under the general supervision of a licensed
health care practitioner as defined by rule, limited to superfluous hair
removal.
(29)  "Practice of electrology instruction" means instructing electrology in a
licensed electrology school.
(30)  "Practice of esthetics instruction" means instructing esthetics in a
licensed esthetics school, a licensed cosmetology/barber school, or
instructing master-level esthetics in a licensed esthetics school or in an
apprenticeship program as defined in Subsections 58-11a-306(2), (3), and (4).
(31) (a)  "Practice of master-level esthetics" means:
(i)  any of the following when done for cosmetic purposes on the head, face,
neck, torso, abdomen, back, arms, hands, legs, feet, eyebrows, or eyelashes
and not for the treatment of medical, physical, or mental ailments:
(A)  body wraps as defined by rule;
(B)  hydrotherapy as defined by rule;
(C)  chemical exfoliation as defined by rule;
(D)  advanced pedicures as defined by rule;
(E)  sanding, including microdermabrasion;
(F)  advanced extraction;
(G)  other esthetic preparations or procedures with the use of:
(I)  the hands; or
(II)  a mechanical or electrical apparatus which is approved for use by
division rule for beautifying or similar work performed on the body for
cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of a medical, physical, or mental
ailment; or
(H)  cosmetic laser procedures under the general supervision of a licensed
health care practitioner as defined by rule, with a physician's evaluation
before the procedure, as needed, and limited to the following:
(I)  superfluous hair removal;
(II)  anti-aging resurfacing enhancements;
(III)  photo rejuvenation; or
(IV)  tattoo removal with a physician's evaluation before the tattoo removal
procedure; and
(ii)  lymphatic massage by manual or other means as defined by rule.
(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (31)(a), a master-level
esthetician may perform procedures listed in Subsection (31)(a)(i) for
noncosmetic purposes if done under the supervision of a licensed health care
practitioner acting within the scope of the licensed health care
practitioner’s license as defined by rule.
(c)  The term "practice of master-level esthetics" includes the practice of
esthetics.
(32)  "Practice of nail technology" means to trim, cut, clean, manicure,
shape, massage, or enhance the appearance of the hands, feet, and nails of an
individual by the use of hands, mechanical, or electrical preparation,
antiseptic, lotions, or creams, including the application and removal of
sculptured or artificial nails.
(33)  "Practice of nail technology instruction" means instructing nail
technology in a licensed nail technician school, licensed cosmetology/barber
school, or in an apprenticeship program as defined in Subsection
58-11a-306(5).
(34)  "Recognized barber school" means a barber school located in a state
other than Utah, whose students, upon graduation, are recognized as having
completed the educational requirements for licensure in that state.
(35)  "Recognized cosmetology/barber school" means a cosmetology/barber school
located in a state other than Utah, whose students, upon graduation, are
recognized as having completed the educational requirements for licensure in
that state.
(36)  "Recognized electrology school" means an electrology school located in a
state other than Utah, whose students, upon graduation, are recognized as
having completed the educational requirements for licensure in that state.
(37)  "Recognized esthetics school" means an esthetics school located in a
state other than Utah, whose students, upon graduation, are recognized as
having completed the educational requirements for licensure in that state.
(38)  "Recognized nail technology school" means a nail technology school
located in a state other than Utah, whose students, upon graduation, are
recognized as having completed the educational requirements for licensure in
that state.
(39)  "Salon" means a place, shop, or establishment in which
cosmetology/barbering, esthetics, electrology, or nail technology is
practiced.
(40)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-11a-502.
(41)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and
58-11a-501 and as may be further defined by rule by the division in
collaboration with the board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
